Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 4. International Airports Revenue Bonds.

Sec. 37.15.410.
Bond authorization.

For the purpose of providing part or all of the money to be used, with or without any grants or other money that may become available, the issuance and sale of revenue bonds of the state in a total principal sum not to exceed $812,500,000 is authorized to acquire, equip, construct, and install the additions, improvements, extensions, and facilities authorized in AS

37.15.510

. The principal of and interest on these bonds shall be paid out of and secured by the gross revenue derived by the state from the ownership, lease, use, and operation of the airports, and of all the facilities of them, and out of any other money that may be appropriated for the purpose, excepting only proceeds of any customer facility charge, and unless otherwise contractually required any customer facility maintenance charge, set by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 5 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2005)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 28, SLA 2005 (SB 153), increasing the authorized amount of international airports revenue bonds, see 2005 Senate Journal 707 — 709.

Sec. 37.15.415.
Continuing revenue bond debt service appropriation.

The amounts required annually to pay the principal, interest, and redemption premium on all issued and outstanding international airports revenue bonds of the state are appropriated each fiscal year from the international airports revenue fund to the state bond committee to make all required payments of principal, interest, and redemption premium.

History.

(§ 2 ch 156 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.420.
International airports construction fund.

There is established the “International Airports Construction Fund,” into which shall be paid the proceeds of the sale of the bonds (except any accrued interest paid on them, which shall be paid into the bond redemption fund) and grant or other money that is legally provided for the same purposes for which the bonds are authorized. The money in the construction fund shall be used to pay the costs of acquiring, equipping, constructing, and installing additions and improvements to and extensions of and facilities for the airports and costs incidental thereto, including costs of the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds. To the extent provided in the bond resolution, money in the construction fund may also be used for the payment of interest on the bonds during the period of actual construction, and for a further period, not exceeding one year after the period of construction, that may be provided in the bond resolution. Money in the construction fund may also be transferred to the bond redemption fund, to the extent provided in the bond resolution, to establish a reserve for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds.

The bond resolution may provide for the investment of money in the construction fund in a manner that the committee may determine. The interest earned upon or any profits derived from the sale of this investment shall be deposited in and become a part of the construction fund.

By January 1 of each year, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall submit to the legislature an annual spending plan that contains information regarding the planned expenditure of money from the construction fund during the next fiscal year and information on certain expenditures made during the previous fiscal year. The spending plan must include

the total amount of money to be spent from the construction fund;

a description of the work to be performed on airport facilities that will be financed with money from the construction fund;

the amount from the construction fund that will be spent under contracts with the private sector and a description of the goods or services to be provided to the state under each of the contracts;

the amounts that the state will spend from the construction fund for purposes other than contract payments and a description of each of those purposes, including financing costs, administrative and other overhead costs, and contingencies;

the amounts spent during the previous fiscal year for cost overruns on projects financed in whole or part with money from the construction fund and the sources of money used for those cost overruns;

identification of time delays that occurred during the previous fiscal year on projects financed in whole or part with money from the construction fund and amounts spent as a result of the delays.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972; am § 54 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 2001; am § 9 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Opinions of attorney general. —

This fund does not represent an unconstitutional dedication of public funds under § 7, art. IX, of the state constitution, as that section of the constitution contains an implied exception for revenue derived from bond issues and for revenue derived from facilities constructed with bond proceeds, at least to the extent that it is necessary to satisfy the debt obligation or maintain the facility so that it continues to generate revenues for that purpose.
November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.15.430.
International airports revenue fund.

There is established an enterprise fund known as the “International Airports Revenue Fund,” into which shall be paid all revenue, fees, charges, and rentals derived by the state from the ownership, lease, use, and operation of the airports and all of the facilities and improvements of them and facilities and improvements used in connection with them, excepting only proceeds of any customer facility charge, and unless otherwise contractually required any customer facility maintenance charge, set by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

. The revenue, charges, fees, and rentals may not include the proceeds of any state tax or license. The money in the revenue fund may only be used for the purpose of

paying or securing the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and of and on any other revenue bonds issued by authorization of the legislature to provide money to acquire, equip, construct, and install additions and improvements to, and extensions of and facilities for, the airports, and to be payable out of the revenue fund;

paying the normal and necessary costs of maintaining and operating the airports and all of the improvements and facilities of them;

paying the costs of renewals, replacements, and extraordinary repairs to the airports and all of the improvements and facilities of them;

redeeming before their fixed maturities any and all revenue bonds issued for the purposes of the airports;

providing money to acquire, construct, and install necessary additions and improvements to and extensions of and facilities for the airports and all of their facilities; and

providing money to pay any and all other costs relating to the ownership, use, and operation of the airports.

The investment of money in the revenue fund may be made in the manner that the committee may determine. The interest earned upon or any profits derived from the sale of this investment shall be deposited in and become a part of the revenue fund.

For proceeds of a customer facility charge set by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

but required to be collected from customers by occupants or users of, or persons under contract to occupy or use, all or a portion of a facility that is or will be acquired, constructed, equipped, installed, or improved for state ownership with the proceeds of indebtedness incurred other than by the state on behalf of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities,

the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall by regulation or contract require that the proceeds of the customer facility charge be remitted directly to a trustee or another third party designated to receive the proceeds and to use the proceeds as provided under AS

02.15.090(h)

; and

the proceeds are not revenue of the state securing any indebtedness other than the indebtedness described in AS

02.15.090(h)

.

For proceeds of a customer facility maintenance charge set by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

but required to be collected from customers by occupants or users of, or persons under contract to occupy or use, all or a portion of a facility that is or will be acquired, constructed, equipped, installed, or improved with proceeds of indebtedness incurred other than by the state on behalf of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities,

the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall by regulation or contract require that the proceeds of the customer facility maintenance charge be remitted directly to a trustee or another third party designated to receive the proceeds and to pay some or all of the costs, fees, and expenses as determined by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

(i); and

the proceeds are not, unless otherwise contractually required, revenue of the state securing any indebtedness.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972; am § 55 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 4, 5 ch 99 SLA 2001; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 5 SLA 2005)

Opinions of attorney general. —

This fund does not represent an unconstitutional dedication of public funds under § 7, art. IX, of the state constitution, as that section of the constitution contains an implied exception for revenue derived from bond issues and for revenue derived from facilities constructed with bond proceeds, at least to the extent that it is necessary to satisfy the debt obligation or maintain the facility so that it continues to generate revenues for that purpose.
November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.15.440.
International airports revenue bond redemption fund.

There is another special fund of the state, known as the “International Airports Revenue Bond Redemption Fund,” which is a trust fund for paying and securing the payment of the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds and which shall be at all times completely segregated and set apart from all other funds of the state. The committee, on behalf of the state, shall obligate and bind the state to set aside and pay into the bond redemption fund any part or parts of, or all of, or a fixed proportion of, or a fixed amount of the money in the revenue fund sufficient to pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds as the payments become due and, if it considers it necessary, to set aside and maintain reserves for this purpose.
The bond redemption fund shall be drawn upon for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds, and the bonds do not constitute a general obligation of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Opinions of attorney general. —

This fund does not represent an unconstitutional dedication of public funds under § 7, art. IX, of the state constitution, as that section of the constitution contains an implied exception for revenue derived from bond issues and for revenue derived from facilities constructed with bond proceeds, at least to the extent that it is necessary to satisfy the debt obligation or maintain the facility so that it continues to generate revenues for that purpose.
November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.15.450.
Bond terms.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, in the amounts or series, and at the time or times that the committee determines. However, the bonds, or each series of them, shall be sold at such a price so that the effective interest rate over the life of the bonds does not exceed 11 percent per year or that rate of interest that is 125 percent of the rate of the Bond Buyer Index of 20 Municipal Bond Average Yields for the week previous to the date of sale of the bonds, whichever is higher. Interest shall be payable annually or semiannually.

The bonds mature at the time or times fixed by the committee. The bonds may be subject to redemption before their fixed maturities as determined by the committee and with a premium or premiums fixed by the committee, but a bond is not subject to redemption before its fixed maturity date unless the right so to redeem that bond is expressly mentioned on the face of the bond. The bonds may be in denominations determined by the committee; may be issued in coupon form or in fully registered form, and may be registrable as to principal or both principal and interest, all under regulations and conditions that the committee shall provide; shall be payable as to principal and interest at such place or places as may be determined by the committee; shall be signed on behalf of the state by the governor and shall be attested by the lieutenant governor, both of which signatures may be facsimile signatures; shall have the seal of the state impressed, printed, or lithographed on them, and each of the interest coupons attached to them shall be signed by the facsimile signatures of these officials; shall be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions, and covenants providing for the payment of the principal of them and interest on them and such other terms, conditions, covenants, and protective features safeguarding this payment and relating to the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the airports as found necessary by the committee, which covenants may include a provision requiring the setting aside and maintenance of certain reserves to secure the payment of this principal and interest. The committee may provide that any additional bonds authorized after June 27, 1972 by the legislature to be payable out of the same source or sources as the bonds authorized as of that date may later be issued on a parity with the bonds authorized as of that date upon compliance with any conditions which the committee may prescribe.

If found reasonably necessary, the committee may select a trustee or trustees for the holders of the bonds or any series of them, for the safeguarding and disbursement of any of the money in any of the funds created by AS

37.15.420

,

37.15.430

, and

37.15.440

, or for duties with respect to the authentication, delivery, and registration of the bonds as the committee may determine, and shall fix the rights, duties, powers, and obligations of the trustee or trustees.

In its determination of all of the matters and questions relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds and the fixing of the maturities, terms, conditions, and covenants of them as provided in (a), (b), and (c) of this section, the decisions of the committee shall be those found to be reasonably necessary for the best interests of the state and its inhabitants, and those that will accomplish the most advantageous sale of the bonds, with due regard, however, to necessary or normal costs of maintenance and operation, renewals, and replacements of and repairs to the airports and to all improvements to them and facilities of them owned, used, operated, or leased in connection with them, the future growth and expansion of the airports and all of such facilities, and the possibility of additional revenue bond financing for airports purposes. Any such decisions of the committee, as expressed in any bond resolution, are final and conclusive when any bonds have been issued pursuant to the bond resolution.

A bond resolution may provide that the bonds issued must contain a recital that they are issued under AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

, and a bond containing this recital shall be conclusively considered to be valid and to have been issued in conformity with AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of bonds is not affected by any proceedings for the acquisition or construction of the additions, improvements, extensions, or facilities for which the bonds have been issued or by any contracts in connection with the acquisition or construction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 19 SLA 1973; am § 4 ch 85 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 110 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

AS

37.15.450

was derived from § 7, ch. 88, SLA 1961, as amended by § 8, ch. 62, SLA 1968 and § 3, ch. 173, SLA 1970.
In the last sentence of what is now designated subsection (b), the only differences between the wording here and in those earlier versions are that “hereafter” was changed to “after the effective date of this Act” and “authorized by this Act” (in two places) was changed to “authorized as of that date.”
The latter change suggests that the date referred to in the former change is June 27, 1972, the effective date of the Act putting these provisions in the Alaska Statutes, rather than April 15, 1961, the effective date of the original international airports bond authorization act.
Therefore, under AS

01.05.031(b)(5)

, the 1972 date has been inserted in the text.

Sec. 37.15.460.
Bond resolution.

The committee shall adopt the bond resolution and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds or any part or series of them. The bond resolution must fix the principal amount, denomination, date, maturities, place or places of payment, rights of redemption, if any, terms, form, conditions, and covenants of the bonds or each series of them.
The committee shall also determine and provide for the date and manner of sale of the bonds, and shall provide whether the notice of sale is to be published elsewhere in addition to the publication required by AS

37.15.450

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Sec. 37.15.470.
Enforcement by holder.

The holder of any bonds or the trustee for the holders of the bonds or any series of them may, by appropriate proceedings in the courts of record of the state, require and compel the transfer, setting aside, and payment of money and the enforcement of all of the terms, conditions, and covenants as required and provided in AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

and in the bond resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For authorization for use of international airport property, see 17 AAC 42, art. 2.

For authorization for use of rural airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 2.

Sec. 37.15.480.
Amounts required for payments.

The committee shall, before December 31 of each year, commencing with the year in which the bonds are issued, certify to the commissioners of revenue and transportation and public facilities the amounts required in the next ensuing calendar year by the bond resolution or resolutions to be paid out of the revenue fund into the bond redemption fund and to be paid into and maintained in any reserve fund or account or any other fund or account created by the bond resolution or resolutions, and shall also certify to the commissioners the last date or dates upon which payments may be made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Sec. 37.15.490.
Bond negotiability.

The bonds and the coupons attached to them are fully negotiable instruments under the laws of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Collateral references. —

Right of secured creditor to have set aside fraudulent transfer of other property by his debtor.
8 ALR4th 1123.

Sec. 37.15.500.
Airport charges.

As provided in AS

02.15.090(a)

, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall fix and collect the fees, charges, and rentals derived by the state from the ownership, lease, use, and operation of the airports and all of the facilities and improvements that will provide revenue sufficient to comply with all of the covenants of the bond resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 33 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

Sec. 37.15.510.
State improvements to airports.

The state is authorized to acquire, equip, construct, and install additions and improvements to and extensions of the airports, facilities for the landing, parking, loading, storing, repairing, safety, and utility of aircraft at the airports and passenger, freight, and terminal facilities, including safety equipment and devices at the airports, found to be necessary by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Sec. 37.15.520.
Refunding.

The bonds or any part of them may be refunded at or before their maturity by the issuance of refunding revenue bonds of the state if in the opinion of the committee refunding is advantageous to and in the best interests of the state and its inhabitants.

The issuance of refunding bonds need not be authorized by an Act of the legislature, and the committee shall adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, exchange, or sale, and delivery of such bonds. All provisions of AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

applicable to revenue bonds are applicable to the refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange of them, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds to be refunded by them, and, in addition, for the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds, and the issuance of the refunding bonds. These expenses include the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the refunding bonds are sold, any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale of them to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to the call of them or agreement with the holders of them, and the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing on them to the date of the call or retirement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Collateral references. —

Power of governmental unit to issue bonds as implying power to refund them. 1 ALR2d 134.

Sec. 37.15.530.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds are legal investments for all banks, trust companies, savings banks, savings and loan associations, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries.
The bonds may be accepted as security for deposits of all funds of the state and its political subdivisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Sec. 37.15.540.
Statutory construction.

AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

shall be liberally construed in order to carry out the purposes for which they were enacted, and all existing laws in conflict with any of these sections are superseded insofar as necessary to accomplish the purposes of and carry out the provisions of these sections.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For authorization for use of international airport property, see 17 AAC 42, art. 2.

For authorization for use of rural airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 2.

Sec. 37.15.550.
Definitions.

In AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“airports” means the international airports owned and operated by the state and located at or near the cities of Anchorage and Fairbanks;

“bond redemption fund” means the International Airports Revenue Bond Redemption Fund created by AS

37.15.440

, including any accounts that are created in that fund after June 27, 1972;

“bond resolution” means the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of bonds, adopted by the committee under AS

37.15.460

;

“bonds” means the international airports revenue bonds authorized by AS

37.15.410

—

37.15.550

;

“commissioner of revenue” means the principal executive officer of the Department of Revenue of the state as provided in AS

44.25.010

, or a successor;

“commissioner of transportation and public facilities” means the principal executive officer of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities of the state as provided in AS

44.42.010

, or a successor;

“committee” means the state bond committee created by AS

37.15.110

, or any other committee, body, department, or officer of the state which or who succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the state bond committee by lawful Act of the legislature;

“construction fund” means the International Airports Construction Fund created by AS

37.15.420

;

“revenue fund” means the International Airports Revenue Fund created by AS

37.15.430

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 149 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1988 to alphabetize the defined terms.